Indiana, session 2026, SB60.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 12-15-5-14, AS AMENDED BY P.L.129-2018,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 14. (a) As used in this section, "advanced practice
registered nurse" means:
(1) a nurse practitioner; or
(2) a clinical nurse specialist;
who is a registered nurse licensed under IC 25-23 and qualified to
practice nursing in a specialty role based upon the additional
knowledge and skill gained through a formal organized program of
study and clinical experience, or the equivalent as determined by the
Indiana state board of nursing.
(b) As used in this section, "office" includes the following:
(1) The office of the secretary of family and social services.
(2) A managed care organization that has contracted with the
office of Medicaid policy and planning under this article.
(3) A person that has contracted with a managed care organization
described in subdivision (2).
2026 IN 60—LS 6218/DI 148


(c) The office shall reimburse eligible Medicaid claims for the
following services provided by an advanced practice registered nurse
employed by a community mental health center if the services are part
of the advanced practice registered nurse's scope of practice:
(1) Mental health services.
(2) Behavioral health services.
(3) Substance abuse treatment.
(4) Primary care services.
(5) Evaluation and management services for inpatient or
outpatient psychiatric treatment.
(6) Prescription drugs.
(d) The office shall include an advanced practice registered nurse
as an eligible provider for the supervision of a plan of treatment for a
patient's outpatient mental health or substance abuse treatment
services, if the supervision is in the advanced practice registered
nurse's scope of practice, education, and training.
(e) This section
(1) may not be construed to expand an advanced practice
registered nurse's scope of practice. and
(2) is subject to IC 25-23-1-19.4(c) and applies only if the service
is included in the advanced practice registered nurse's practice
agreement with a collaborating physician.
SECTION 2. IC 12-23-18-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.143-2025,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) The division shall adopt rules under
IC 4-22-2 to establish the following:
(1) Standards for operation of an opioid treatment program in
Indiana, including the following requirements:
(A) Except as otherwise prescribed by the division, an opioid
treatment program shall obtain prior authorization from the
division for any patient receiving more than fourteen (14) days
of opioid maintenance treatment medications at one (1) time
and the division may approve the authorization only under the
following circumstances:
(i) A physician licensed under IC 25-22.5 has issued an
order for the opioid treatment medication.
(ii) The patient has not tested positive under a drug test for
a drug for which the patient does not have a prescription for
a period of time set forth by the division.
(iii) The opioid treatment program has determined that the
benefit to the patient in receiving the take home opioid
treatment medication outweighs the potential risk of
2026 IN 60—LS 6218/DI 148


diversion of the take home opioid treatment medication.
(B) Minimum requirements for a licensed physician's regular:
(i) physical presence in the opioid treatment facility; and
(ii) physical evaluation and progress evaluation of each
opioid treatment program patient.
(C) Minimum staffing requirements by licensed and
unlicensed personnel.
(D) Clinical standards for the appropriate tapering of a patient
on and off of an opioid treatment medication.
(2) A requirement that, not later than February 28 of each year, a
current diversion control plan that meets the requirements of 21
CFR Part 290 and 42 CFR Part 8 be submitted for each opioid
treatment facility.
(3) Fees to be paid by an opioid treatment program for deposit in
the fund for annual certification under this chapter as described
in section 3 of this chapter.
The fees established under this subsection must be sufficient to pay the
cost of implementing this chapter.
(b) The division shall conduct an annual onsite visit of each opioid
treatment program facility to assess compliance with this chapter.
(c) Not later than April 1 of each year, the division shall report to
the general assembly in electronic format under IC 5-14-6 the
following information:
(1) The number of prior authorizations that were approved under
subsection (a)(1)(A) in the previous year and the:
(A) time frame for each approval; and
(B) duration of each approved treatment.
(2) The number of authorizations under subdivision (1) that were,
in the previous year, revoked due to a patient's violation of an
applicable term or condition.
(3) The number of each of the actions taken under section 5.8(a)
of this chapter in the previous year.
(4) The number and type of violations assessed for each action
specified in section 5.8(a) of this chapter in the previous year.
(d) A facility shall report, in a manner prescribed by the division, all
information required by the division to complete the report described
in subsection (c).
(e) An opioid treatment program may close on Sundays and a
national legal holiday recognized by the federal government.
(f) The division may not require the medical director of an opioid
treatment program to obtain admitting privileges at a hospital.
(g) Any of the following health care providers may conduct an
2026 IN 60—LS 6218/DI 148


initial assessment, examination, or evaluation of a patient, including
documenting the information in the patient's medical record, that is
within the health care provider's scope of practice and upon the
patient's admission to an opioid treatment program:
(1) A physician licensed under IC 25-22.5.
(2) An advanced practice registered nurse who
(A) is licensed under and meets the requirements of IC 25-23.
and
(B) maintains a collaborative agreement under
IC 25-23-1-19.4 with a physician who works onsite at the
opioid treatment program.
(3) A physician assistant who:
(A) is licensed under IC 25-27.5; and
(B) maintains a collaborative agreement with a physician who
works onsite at the opioid treatment program.
(h) The division may not establish rules or guidelines that are more
stringent than the regulations set forth in 42 CFR 8.12 concerning the
following:
(1) Criteria for patient admission to an opioid treatment program.
(2) Clinical standards concerning the administering or dispensing
of an initial dose of opioid treatment medication.
SECTION 3. IC 16-41-6-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.112-2020,
SECTION 19, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) As used in this section, "physician's
authorized representative" means an individual acting under the
supervision of a licensed physician and within the individual's
scope of employment.
(1) an advanced practice registered nurse (as defined by
IC 25-23-1-1(b)) who is operating in collaboration with a licensed
physician; or
(2) an individual acting under the supervision of a licensed
physician and within the individual's scope of employment.
(b) A physician, an advanced practice registered nurse, or the
physician's authorized representative shall not order an HIV test on an
individual under the care of a physician unless the physician, the
advanced practice registered nurse, or the physician's authorized
representative does the following:
(1) Informs the patient of the test, orally or in writing.
(2) Provides the patient with an explanation of the test orally, in
writing, by video, or by a combination of these methods.
(3) Informs the patient of the patient's right to ask questions and
to refuse the test.
2026 IN 60—LS 6218/DI 148


Subject to subsection (e), if the patient refuses the test, the physician,
the advanced practice registered nurse, or the physician's authorized
representative may not perform the test and shall document the patient's
refusal in the patient's medical record.
(c) Unless it is clearly not feasible, the information delivered to the
patient who is to be tested under subsection (b) must be provided in the
native language or other communication used by the patient. If the
patient is unable to read written materials, the materials must be
translated or read to the patient in a language the patient understands.
(d) After ordering an HIV test for a patient, the physician, the
advanced practice registered nurse, or the physician's authorized
representative shall notify the patient of the test results and the
availability of HIV and other bloodborne disease prevention
counseling. If a test conducted under this section indicates that a
patient is HIV positive, in addition to the requirements set forth in
IC 16-41-2, the physician, the advanced practice registered nurse,
or the physician's authorized representative shall inform the patient of
the availability of counseling and of the treatment and referral options
available to the patient.
(e) A physician, an advanced practice registered nurse, or a
physician's authorized representative may order an HIV test to be
performed without informing the patient or the patient's representative
(as defined in IC 16-36-1-2) of the test or regardless of the patient's or
the patient's representative's refusal of the HIV test if any of the
following conditions apply:
(1) If ordered by a physician or an advanced practice registered
nurse, consent can be implied due to emergency circumstances
and the test is medically necessary to diagnose or treat the
patient's emergent condition.
(2) Under a court order based on clear and convincing evidence
of a serious and present health threat to others posed by an
individual. A patient shall be notified of the patient's right to:
(A) a hearing; and
(B) counsel;
before a hearing is held under this subdivision. Any hearing
conducted under this subdivision shall be held in camera at the
request of the individual.
(3) If the test is done on blood collected or tested anonymously as
part of an epidemiologic survey under IC 16-41-2-3 or
IC 16-41-17-10(a)(5).
(4) The test is ordered under section 4 of this chapter.
(5) The test is required or authorized under IC 11-10-3-2.5.
2026 IN 60—LS 6218/DI 148


(6) The individual upon whom the test will be performed is
described in IC 16-41-8-6 or IC 16-41-10-2.5.
(7) A court has ordered the individual to undergo testing for HIV
under IC 35-38-1-10.5(a) or IC 35-38-2-2.3(a)(17).
(f) The state department shall make HIV testing and treatment
information from the federal Centers for Disease Control and
Prevention available to health care providers.
(g) The state department may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 necessary
to implement this section.
SECTION 4. IC 25-1-9-6.8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.129-2018,
SECTION 23, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6.8. (a) This section applies to a practitioner who
is:
(1) licensed to practice medicine or osteopathic medicine under
IC 25-22.5; or
(2) an advanced practice registered nurse granted prescriptive
authority under IC 25-23. and whose practice agreement with a
collaborating physician reflects the conditions specified in
subsection (b).
(b) Before prescribing a stimulant medication for a child for the
treatment of attention deficit disorder or attention deficit hyperactivity
disorder, a practitioner described in subsection (a) shall follow the most
recent guidelines adopted by the American Academy of Pediatrics or
the American Academy of Child and Adolescent Psychiatry for the
diagnosis and evaluation of a child with attention deficit disorder or
attention deficit hyperactivity disorder.
SECTION 5. IC 25-23-1-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.129-2018,
SECTION 28, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. As used in this chapter:
(a) "Board" means the Indiana state board of nursing.
(b) "Advanced practice registered nurse" means:
(1) a nurse practitioner;
(2) a certified nurse midwife;
(3) a clinical nurse specialist; or
(4) a certified registered nurse anesthetist;
who is a registered nurse qualified to practice nursing in a specialty
role based upon the additional knowledge and skill gained through a
formal organized program of study and clinical experience, or the
equivalent as determined by the board, which does not limit but
extends or expands the function of the nurse which may be initiated by
the client or provider. in settings that shall include hospital outpatient
clinics and health maintenance organizations. Notwithstanding any
2026 IN 60—LS 6218/DI 148


other law, this subsection does not add to the powers and duties or
scope of practice of certified registered nurse anesthetists as described
in section 30 of this chapter.
(c) "Human response" means those signs, symptoms, behaviors, and
processes that denote the individual's interaction with the environment.
SECTION 6. IC 25-23-1-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.69-2022,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) The board shall do the following:
(1) Adopt under IC 4-22-2 rules necessary to enable it to carry
into effect this chapter.
(2) Prescribe standards and approve curricula for nursing
education programs preparing persons for licensure under this
chapter.
(3) Provide for surveys of such programs at such times as it
considers necessary.
(4) Accredit such programs as meet the requirements of this
chapter and of the board.
(5) Deny or withdraw accreditation from nursing education
programs for failure to meet prescribed curricula or other
standards.
(6) Examine, license, and renew the license of qualified
applicants.
(7) Issue subpoenas, compel the attendance of witnesses, and
administer oaths to persons giving testimony at hearings.
(8) Cause the prosecution of all persons violating this chapter and
have power to incur necessary expenses for these prosecutions.
(9) Adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 that do the following:
(A) Prescribe standards for the competent practice of
registered, practical, and advanced practice registered nursing.
(B) Establish with the approval of the medical licensing board
created by IC 25-22.5-2-1 requirements that advanced practice
registered nurses must meet to be granted authority to
prescribe legend drugs and to retain that authority.
(C) Establish, with the approval of the medical licensing board
created by IC 25-22.5-2-1, requirements for the renewal of a
practice agreement under section 19.4 of this chapter, which
shall expire on October 31 in each odd-numbered year.
(10) Keep a record of all its proceedings.
(11) Collect and distribute annually demographic information on
the number and type of registered nurses and licensed practical
nurses employed in Indiana.
(12) Adopt rules and administer the interstate nurse licensure
2026 IN 60—LS 6218/DI 148


compact under IC 25-42.
(13) Adopt or amend rules to implement the nursing licensure by
endorsement available for foreign nursing school graduates under
sections 11 and 12 of this chapter.
(14) Establish an audit procedure, which may include
requiring an advanced practice registered nurse to provide
the licensing agency with verification of:
(A) national certification or its equivalency; or
(B) completion of a continuing education course that the
advanced practice registered nurse attended during the
previous two (2) years.
(b) The board may do the following:
(1) Create ad hoc subcommittees representing the various nursing
specialties and interests of the profession of nursing. Persons
appointed to a subcommittee serve for terms as determined by the
board.
(2) Utilize the appropriate subcommittees so as to assist the board
with its responsibilities. The assistance provided by the
subcommittees may include the following:
(A) Recommendation of rules necessary to carry out the duties
of the board.
(B) Recommendations concerning educational programs and
requirements.
(C) Recommendations regarding examinations and licensure
of applicants.
(3) Appoint nurses to serve on each of the ad hoc subcommittees.
(c) Nurses appointed under subsection (b) must:
(1) be committed to advancing and safeguarding the nursing
profession as a whole; and
(2) represent nurses who practice in the field directly affected by
a subcommittee's actions.
SECTION 7. IC 25-23-1-19.4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.127-2020,
SECTION 8, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 19.4. (a) This section does not apply to certified
registered nurse anesthetists.
(b) As used in this section, "practitioner" has the meaning set forth
in IC 16-42-19-5. However, the term does not include the following:
(1) A veterinarian.
(2) An advanced practice registered nurse.
(3) A physician assistant.
(c) An advanced practice registered nurse shall operate:
(1) in collaboration with a licensed practitioner as evidenced by
2026 IN 60—LS 6218/DI 148


a practice agreement;
(2) by privileges granted by the governing board of a hospital
licensed under IC 16-21 with the advice of the medical staff of the
hospital that sets forth the manner in which an advanced practice
registered nurse and a licensed practitioner will cooperate,
coordinate, and consult with each other in the provision of health
care to their patients; or
(3) by privileges granted by the governing body of a hospital
operated under IC 12-24-1 that sets forth the manner in which an
advanced practice registered nurse and a licensed practitioner will
cooperate, coordinate, and consult with each other in the
provision of health care to their patients.
(d) (b) This subsection applies for purposes of the Medicaid
program to an advanced practice registered nurse who:
(1) is licensed pursuant to IC 25-23-1-19.5; section 19.5 of this
chapter; and
(2) has been educated and trained to work with patients with
addiction and mental health needs.
An advanced practice registered nurse who meets the requirements of
this subsection has all of the supervisory rights and responsibilities,
including prior authorization, that are available to a licensed physician
or a health service provider in psychology (HSPP) operating in a
community mental health center certified under IC 12-21-2-3(5)(C).
(e) Before January 1, 2021, the office of the secretary shall apply to
the United States Department of Health and Human Services for any
state plan amendment necessary to implement subsection (d).
SECTION 8. IC 25-23-1-19.6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.28-2019,
SECTION 14, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 19.6. (a) When the board grants authority to an
advanced practice registered nurse to prescribe legend drugs under this
chapter, the board shall assign an identification number to the
advanced practice registered nurse.
(b) An advanced practice registered nurse who is granted authority
by the board to prescribe legend drugs must do the following:
(1) Enter on each prescription form that the advanced practice
registered nurse uses to prescribe a legend drug:
(A) the signature of the advanced practice registered nurse;
(B) initials indicating the credentials awarded to the advanced
practice registered nurse under this chapter; and
(C) the identification number assigned to the advanced
practice registered nurse under subsection (a).
(2) Transmit the prescription in an electronic format for an
2026 IN 60—LS 6218/DI 148


electronically transmitted prescription.
(3) Comply with all applicable state and federal laws concerning
prescriptions for legend drugs, including the requirement to issue
electronically transmitted prescriptions under IC 25-1-9.3.
(c) An advanced practice registered nurse may be granted authority
to prescribe legend drugs under this chapter only within the scope of
practice of the advanced practice registered nurse. and the scope of the
licensed collaborating health practitioner.
SECTION 9. IC 25-23-1-19.8 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 19.8. (a) Before December 31 of an even-numbered year,
the Indiana professional licensing agency or the agency's designee shall
randomly audit at least one percent (1%) but not more than ten percent
(10%) of the practice agreements of advanced practice registered
nurses with authority to prescribe legend drugs under section 19.5 of
this chapter to determine whether the practice agreement meets the
requirements of this chapter or rules adopted by the board.
(b) The Indiana professional licensing agency shall establish an
audit procedure, which may include the following:
(1) Requiring the advanced practice registered nurse to provide
the agency with a copy of verification of attendance at or
completion of a continuing education course or program the
advanced practice registered nurse attended during the previous
two (2) years.
(2) Requiring the advanced practice registered nurse and the
licensed practitioner who have entered into a practice agreement
to submit information on a form prescribed by the agency that
must include a sworn statement signed by the advanced practice
registered nurse and the licensed practitioner that the parties are
operating within the terms of the practice agreement and the
requirements under this chapter or rules adopted by the board.
(3) Reviewing patient health records and other patient information
at the practice location or by requiring the submission of accurate
copies to determine if the parties are operating within the terms
of the practice agreement and the requirements under this chapter
or rules adopted by the board.
(4) After a reasonable determination that the advanced practice
registered nurse and the licensed practitioner who have entered
into a practice agreement are not operating within the terms of the
practice agreement, requiring the parties to appear before the
agency or the agency's designee to provide evidence of
compliance with the practice agreement.
(c) Not more than sixty (60) days after the completion of the audit
2026 IN 60—LS 6218/DI 148


required in subsection (a), the Indiana professional licensing agency
shall provide the board with the following:
(1) A summary of the information obtained in the audit.
(2) A statement regarding whether an advanced practice
registered nurse and a licensed practitioner who have entered into
a practice agreement that is audited under subsection (a) are
operating within the terms of the practice agreement.
The agency shall also provide a copy of the information described in
this subsection to the board that regulates the licensed practitioner.
(d) The Indiana professional licensing agency may cause to be
served upon the advanced practice registered nurse an order to show
cause to the board as to why the board should not impose disciplinary
sanctions under IC 25-1-9-9 on the advanced practice registered nurse
for the advanced practice registered nurse's failure to comply with:
(1) an audit conducted under this section; or
(2) the requirements of a practice agreement under this chapter.
(e) Except for a violation concerning continuing education
requirements under IC 25-1-4, the board shall hold a hearing in
accordance with IC 4-21.5 and state the date, time, and location of the
hearing in the order served under subsection (d).
(f) The board that regulates the licensed practitioner may cause to
be served upon the licensed practitioner an order to show cause to the
board as to why the board should not impose disciplinary sanctions
under IC 25-1-9-9 on the licensed practitioner for the licensed
practitioner's failure to comply with:
(1) an audit conducted under this section; or
(2) the requirements of a practice agreement under this chapter.
(g) The board that regulates the licensed practitioner shall hold a
hearing in accordance with IC 4-21.5 and state the date, time, and
location of the hearing in the order served under subsection (f).
(h) An order to show cause issued under this section must comply
with the notice requirements of IC 4-21.5.
(i) The licensed practitioner may divulge health records and other
patient information to the Indiana professional licensing agency or the
agency's designee. The licensed practitioner is immune from civil
liability for any action based upon release of the patient information
under this section.
SECTION 10. IC 34-30-2.1-374 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]. Sec. 374. IC 25-23-1-19.8(i) (Concerning licensed
practitioners who release health records and patient information to the
Indiana professional licensing agency).
SECTION 11. IC 35-48-3-11, AS AMENDED BY P.L.129-2018,
2026 IN 60—LS 6218/DI 148


SECTION 45, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11. (a) Only a physician licensed under
IC 25-22.5, a physician assistant licensed under IC 25-27.5, or an
advanced practice registered nurse licensed under IC 25-23 with
prescriptive authority may treat a patient with a Schedule III or
Schedule IV controlled substance for the purpose of weight reduction
or to control obesity.
(b) A physician licensed under IC 25-22.5, a physician assistant
licensed under IC 25-27.5, or an advanced practice registered nurse
licensed under IC 25-23 with prescriptive authority may not prescribe,
dispense, administer, supply, sell, or give any amphetamine,
sympathomimetic amine drug, or compound designated as a Schedule
III or Schedule IV controlled substance under IC 35-48-2-8 and
IC 35-48-2-10 for a patient for purposes of weight reduction or to
control obesity, unless the physician, physician assistant, or advanced
practice registered nurse does the following:
(1) Determines:
(A) through review of:
(i) the physician's records of prior treatment of the patient;
or
(ii) the records of prior treatment of the patient provided by
a previous treating physician practitioner or weight loss
program;
that the physician's patient has made a reasonable effort to lose
weight in a treatment program using a regimen of weight
reduction based on caloric restriction, nutritional counseling,
behavior modification, and exercise without using controlled
substances; and
(B) that the treatment described in clause (A) has been
ineffective for the physician's patient.
(2) Obtains a thorough history and performs a thorough physical
examination of the physician's patient before initiating a treatment
plan using a Schedule III or Schedule IV controlled substance for
purposes of weight reduction or to control obesity.
(c) A physician licensed under IC 25-22.5, a physician assistant
licensed under IC 25-27.5, or an advanced practice registered nurse
licensed under IC 25-23 with prescriptive authority may not begin and
shall discontinue using a Schedule III or Schedule IV controlled
substance for purposes of weight reduction or to control obesity after
the physician, physician assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse
determines in the physician's, physician assistant's, or advanced
practice registered nurse's professional judgment that:
2026 IN 60—LS 6218/DI 148


(1) the physician's patient has failed to lose weight using a
treatment plan involving the controlled substance;
(2) the controlled substance has provided a decreasing
contribution toward further weight loss for the patient unless
continuing to take the controlled substance is medically necessary
or appropriate for maintenance therapy;
(3) the physician's patient:
(A) has a history of; or
(B) shows a propensity for;
alcohol or drug abuse; or
(4) the physician's patient has consumed or disposed of a
controlled substance in a manner that does not strictly comply
with a treating physician's, physician assistant's, or advanced
practice registered nurse's direction.
(d) A physician assistant licensed under IC 25-27.5 or an advanced
practice registered nurse licensed under IC 25-23 with prescriptive
authority may not prescribe a schedule II controlled substance for the
purpose of weight reduction or to control obesity.
2026 IN 60—LS 6218/DI 148